Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201618-3211
Report; contents.

Any municipality that creates a clean energy assessment district under the Property Assessed Clean Energy Act shall, on or before January 31 of each year, electronically submit a report to the Urban Affairs Committee of the Legislature on the following:

(1) The number of clean energy assessment districts in the municipality and their location;

(2) The total dollar amount of energy projects undertaken pursuant to the act;

(3) The total dollar amount of outstanding bonds issued under the act;

(4) The total dollar amount of annual assessments collected as of the end of the most recently completed calendar year and the total amount of annual assessments yet to be collected pursuant to assessment contracts signed under the act; and

(5) A description of the types of energy projects undertaken pursuant to the act.

Laws 2016, LB1012, § 11.